District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

31-2412

Temporary Motor Vehicle Insurance Review Commission.

Expired.

1981 Ed., § 35-2112.
Expiration of Temporary Motor Vehicle Insurance Review Commission: Pursuant to subsection (i) of former § 35-2112 1981 Ed., the Temporary Motor Vehicle Insurance Review Commission was to expire 3 years after March 4, 1986. The Temporary Motor Vehicle Insurance Review Commission is deemed to have expired on March 4, 1989.